Florida, session 2026, SB234.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSubsection (13) of section 624.424, Florida 23 Statutes, is amended to read: 24 624.424âAnnual statement and other information.â 25 (13)(a)âEach insurer doing business in this state which 26 pays a fee, commission, or other financial consideration or 27 payment to any affiliate directly or indirectly shall annually 28 is required upon request to provide to the office all of the 29 following any information: the office deems necessary. The fee, 30 commission, or other financial consideration or payment to any 31 affiliate must be fair and reasonable. In determining whether 32 the fee, commission, or other financial consideration or payment 33 is fair and reasonable, the office shall consider, among other 34 things, the actual cost of the service being provided. 35 1.âA description and cost analysis of each service provided 36 by an affiliate, including the actual cost of the service, the 37 amount charged to the insurer, the basis used to determine the 38 amount charged to the insurer, and any profit margin included in 39 the amount charged. 40 2.âA benchmarking study demonstrating that the fee, 41 commission, or other financial consideration is comparable to 42 the rates ordinarily payable to vendors independent of and 43 unaffiliated with the insurer. 44 3.âThe total amount of affiliate fees, commissions, or 45 other financial considerations for the reporting period, whether 46 paid by the insurer or forgiven by the affiliate, reported both 47 in dollars and as a percentage of the insurerâs gross written 48 premiums for that period. 49 4.âA certification that the percentage reported in 50 subparagraph 3. does not exceed 20 percent, or a certification 51 that any amount exceeding 20 percent is necessary for the 52 insurerâs operations, including the specific reasons why such 53 fees, commissions, or other financial considerations are 54 necessary. If the percentage reported in subparagraph 3. exceeds 55 20 percent, the insurer must also report the total amount of any 56 dividends and officer and director compensation paid during the 57 same period. 58 (b)âAs used in this paragraph, the term âmanaging general 59 agentâ has the same meaning as provided in s. 626.015. Each 60 insurer doing business in this state which pays a fee, 61 commission, or other financial consideration or payment to a 62 managing general agent shall annually provide to the office all 63 of the following information: 64 1.âThe total amount of managing general agent fees, 65 commissions, or other financial considerations for the reporting 66 period, whether paid by the insurer or forgiven by the managing 67 general agent, reported both in dollars and as a percentage of 68 the insurerâs gross written premiums for that period. 69 2.âA certification that the percentage reported under 70 subparagraph 1. does not exceed 20 percent, or a certification 71 that any amount exceeding 20 percent is necessary for the 72 insurerâs operations, including the specific reasons why such 73 fees, commissions, or other financial considerations are 74 necessary. If the percentage reported in subparagraph 1. exceeds 75 20 percent, the insurer must also report the total amount of any 76 dividends and officer and director compensation paid during the 77 same period. 78 (c)âThe office shall contract annually with an independent 79 third-party entity with expertise in insurance regulation to 80 conduct a review of affiliate and managing general agent 81 transactions reported under this subsection. The contract must 82 require submission of a final report to the office by February 1 83 of each year, which report must identify any affiliate and 84 managing general agent transactions that are not fair and 85 reasonable. 86 (d)âInsurers shall annually post the information reported 87 under paragraphs (a) and (b) on their websites in a clear and 88 readily accessible format. Information disclosed under 89 paragraphs (a) and (b) is not considered a trade secret and is 90 subject to public disclosure. 91 Section 2.âSection 624.4244, Florida Statutes, is created 92 to read: 93 624.4244âProhibitions relating to affiliate transactions.â 94 (1)âAn insurer may not engage in any transaction or series 95 of transactions with an affiliate which have the purpose or 96 effect of misrepresenting or misstating the insurerâs financial 97 condition. Prohibited transactions include, but are not limited 98 to, transactions in which an affiliate forgives, waives, or 99 otherwise cancels fees or other amounts owed by the insurer for 100 the purpose or effect of manipulating the insurerâs financial 101 position, or engaging in circular transactions intended to 102 misrepresent the insurerâs financial condition. 103 (2)âAn insurer may not declare or pay dividends to 104 shareholders or issue executive bonuses if the insurer is in 105 hazardous financial condition, as defined in s. 627.942, or if 106 its financial statements or reports to the office indicate that 107 the insurerâs financial condition has been materially affected 108 by high affiliate fees or expenses. 109 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.